Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 2. General Policy Provisions.

Sec. 28.22.100.
General policy provisions. [Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.22.101.
General coverage requirements; policy limits.

An owner’s motor vehicle liability policy must designate by description or appropriate reference the motor vehicles that it covers and insure the person named against loss from the liability imposed by law for damages that arise from the ownership, maintenance, or use of a designated motor vehicle.

An operator’s motor vehicle liability policy must insure the person named as insured against loss from the liability imposed by law for damages that arise from the use by the operator of a motor vehicle not owned by the operator.

A personal motor vehicle liability policy must insure the person named as insured against loss from liability imposed by law for damages that arise from the ownership, maintenance, or use by the named person of a motor vehicle whether owned or not owned by the person.

A motor vehicle liability policy must provide coverage in the United States or Canada, subject to limits exclusive of interest and costs, with respect to each vehicle, as follows:

$50,000 because of bodily injury to or death of one person in one accident, and, subject to the same limit for one person, $100,000 because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in one accident; and

$25,000 because of injury to or destruction of property of others in one accident.

A motor vehicle liability policy must provide coverage under AS

28.22.201

—

28.22.231

in the amounts set out in (d) of this section for the protection of the persons insured under the policy who are legally entitled to recover damages from the owner or operator of an uninsured or underinsured motor vehicle because of bodily injury or death, or damage to or destruction of property arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of the uninsured or underinsured motor vehicle. This subsection does not require coverage for punitive damages that might otherwise be recoverable from an uninsured or underinsured person.

A motor vehicle liability policy must state the name and address of the named insured and meet the requirements of AS

21.42.160

—

21.42.170

. In the absence of specific contract language or endorsement, the motor vehicle liability policy issued for a person in this state is presumed to meet the minimum requirements of (d) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989; am § 5 ch 172 SLA 2004)

Sec. 28.22.110.
Maximum liability of carrier. [Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.22.111.
Policy provisions that are implied.

A motor vehicle liability policy is subject to the following provisions which do not need to be set out in the policy:

satisfaction by the insured of a judgment for injury or damages is not a condition precedent to the right or duty of the insurance carrier to make payment on account of injury or damage;

the insurance carrier may settle a claim covered by the policy, and if settlement is made in good faith, the amount of settlement is deductible from the limits of liability specified in AS

28.22.101

;

the policy, the written application for the policy, if any, and every rider or endorsement that does not conflict with the provisions of this chapter constitute the entire contract between the parties.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989)

Sec. 28.22.120.
Policy coverage and priorities. [Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.22.121.
Excess of additional coverage.

A policy that grants the coverage required for a motor vehicle liability policy may also grant lawful coverage in excess of or in addition to the coverage specified for a policy and the excess or additional coverage is not subject to the provisions of this chapter. With respect to a policy that grants excess or additional coverage, the term “motor vehicle liability policy” applies only to that part of the coverage that is required by this chapter.

A policy is excluded from the application of this chapter if the automobile or motor vehicle liability coverage is provided only on an excess or umbrella basis.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989)

Sec. 28.22.130.
Policy coverage exclusions. [Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.22.131.
Proration.

A motor vehicle liability policy may provide for proration of the insurance with other valid and collectible insurance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989)

Sec. 28.22.141.
Other requirements of policy.

A policy is not effective under AS

28.22.101

unless it is issued by an insurance company or surety company authorized to do business in this state, except as provided in (b) of this section.

A policy is not effective under AS

28.22.101

with respect to a vehicle not registered in the state or a vehicle that was registered in another jurisdiction on the effective date of the policy or the most recent renewal of it, unless the insurance or surety company issuing the policy is authorized to do business in the state, or if the company is not authorized to do business in the state, unless it executes a power of attorney authorizing the director of the division of insurance to accept service of process on its behalf in an action upon the policy arising out of the accident.

The requirements for a motor vehicle liability policy may be fulfilled by the policies of one or more insurance carriers that together meet the requirements.

A binder issued pending the issuance of a motor vehicle liability policy fulfills the requirements for a policy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989)